Hawaii statutes.
[§486-132] Enforcement; rules. The
board is authorized to enforce the provisions of this part and shall adopt
reasonable rules for the implementation and enforcement of this part. These
rules shall have the force and effect of law. The board may adopt rules that
include, but are not limited to, the licensing of measuremasters; determining
the qualifications of the applicant for a license as a public measuremaster;
annual license fees; the granting, renewal, or refusal of a license; period of
license validity; measurement practices that must be followed, including the
measurement or recording of tare; the required information to be submitted with
or as part of a certificate; and the period of record keeping. [L 1991, c 153,
pt of §7]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next